North Carolina, session 2025, SB300.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina
Reclaiming College Education on America's Constitutional Heritage Act" or the "NC REACH
Act."

PART II. REQUIRE THREE CREDIT HOURS OF INSTRUCTION IN AMERICAN
HISTORY OR AMERICAN GOVERNMENT AT CONSTITUENT INSTITUTIONS OF
THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 116-11(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) The Except as provided in subdivision (15) of this section, the Board shall
determine the functions, educational activities and academic programs of the
constituent institutions. The Board shall also determine the types of degrees
to be awarded. The powers herein given to the Board shall not be restricted by
any provision of law assigning specific functions or responsibilities to
designated institutions, the powers herein given superseding any such
provisions of law. The Board, after adequate notice and after affording the
institutional board of trustees an opportunity to be heard, shall have authority
to withdraw approval of any existing program if it appears that the program is
unproductive, excessively costly or unnecessarily duplicative. The Board shall
review the productivity of academic degree programs every two years, using
criteria specifically developed to determine program productivity."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(15) The Board of Governors shall adopt a policy requiring each constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina to require at least three credit
hours of instruction in American history or American government, in
accordance with G.S. 116-11.5, in order to graduate from the institution with
a baccalaureate degree."
*S300-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(c) Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-11.5. American history or American government instruction required for
graduation with a baccalaureate degree.
(a) Each constituent institution of The University of North Carolina that offers a
baccalaureate degree shall require as a condition of graduation with a baccalaureate degree that
all students complete at least three credit hours of instruction in American history or American
government that provides a comprehensive overview of the major events and turning points of
American history and government. A course required pursuant to this section shall meet the
following criteria:
(1) Require each student to read at least the following documents in their entirety:
a. The Constitution of the United States of America.
b. The Declaration of Independence.
c. The Emancipation Proclamation.
d. At least five essays from the Federalist Papers, as determined by the
instructor.
e. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s Letter from Birmingham Jail.
f. The Gettysburg Address.
g. The North Carolina State Constitution.
(2) Include a cumulative final exam on the principles in the documents listed in
subdivision (1) of this subsection. The final exam shall meet the following
criteria:
a. Comprise at least twenty percent (20%) of the student's total course
grade.
b. Focus substantially on the provisions and principles of the documents
listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the perspectives of the
authors of the documents, and the relevant historic contexts at the time
the documents were written.
(b) The chancellor of each constituent institution, or his or her designee, may exempt a
student from the requirements of this section if the student has successfully completed at least
three credit hours of instruction in American history or American government in a
postsecondary-level course provided outside the constituent institution that satisfies the
requirements of this section, including credit based on the following:
(1) A passing score on an Advanced Placement exam.
(2) A passing score on an International Baccalaureate exam.
(3) A passing score on an AS-Level or A-Level Cambridge Advanced
International Certificate of Education (AICE) course.
(4) A passing grade in a dual enrollment course.
(c) The Board of Governors shall ensure that the requirements of this section are
incorporated into the degree requirements of all baccalaureate programs and do not do any of the
following:
(1) Add to the total number of credit hours required for a degree.
(2) Conflict with the accreditation process for any constituent institution.
(d) The Board of Governors shall ensure that each constituent institution complies with
the requirements of this section. No later than November 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
Board shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on compliance with
this section by each constituent institution. The report shall include, at a minimum, a copy of the
syllabus for each course that is offered to comply with this section.
(e) The Board of Governors, in its discretion, may remove the chancellor of a constituent
institution for failure to comply with this section over more than one academic year."

Page 2 Senate Bill 300-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART III. REQUIRE THREE CREDIT HOURS OF INSTRUCTION IN AMERICAN
HISTORY OR AMERICAN GOVERNMENT AT NORTH CAROLINA COMMUNITY
COLLEGES
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115D-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(aa) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy requiring each
community college to require at least three credit hours of instruction in American history or
American government, in accordance with G.S. 115D-11, in order to graduate from the
community college with an associate degree."
SECTION 3.(b) Article 1 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115D-11. American history or American government instruction required for
graduation with an associate degree.
(a) Each community college shall require as a condition of graduation with an associate
degree that all students complete at least three credit hours of instruction in American history or
American government that provides a comprehensive overview of the major events and turning
points of American history and government. A course required pursuant to this section shall meet
the following criteria:
(1) Require each student to read at least the following documents in their entirety:
a. The Constitution of the United States of America.
b. The Declaration of Independence.
c. The Emancipation Proclamation.
d. At least five essays from the Federalist Papers, as determined by the
instructor.
e. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s Letter from Birmingham Jail.
f. The Gettysburg Address.
g. The North Carolina State Constitution.
(2) Include a cumulative final exam on the principles in the documents listed in
subdivision (1) of this subsection. The final exam shall meet the following
criteria:
a. Comprise at least twenty percent (20%) of the student's total course
grade.
b. Focus substantially on the provisions and principles of the documents
listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the perspectives of the
authors of the documents, and the relevant historic contexts at the time
the documents were written.
(b) The president of a community college, or his or her designee, may exempt a student
from the requirements of this section if the student has successfully completed at least three credit
hours of instruction in American history or American government in a postsecondary-level
course provided outside the community college that satisfies the requirements of this section,
including credit based on the following:
(1) A passing score on an Advanced Placement exam.
(2) A passing score on an International Baccalaureate exam.
(3) A passing score on an AS-Level or A-Level Cambridge Advanced
International Certificate of Education (AICE) course.
(4) A passing grade in a dual enrollment course.
(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall ensure that the requirements of this
section are incorporated into the degree requirements of all associate degree programs and do not
do either of the following:
(1) Add to the total number of credit hours required for a degree.
(2) Conflict with the accreditation process for any institution.
Senate Bill 300-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) The State Board of Community Colleges shall ensure that each community college
complies with the requirements of this section. No later than November 15, 2026, and annually
thereafter, the Board shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on
compliance with this section by each community college. The report shall include, at a minimum,
a copy of the syllabus for each course that is offered to comply with this section.
(e) The State Board of Community Colleges, in its discretion, may remove the president
of a community college for failure to comply with this section over more than one academic
year."

PART IV. ALIGN FOUNDING PRINCIPLES COURSE REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 115C-81.45(d) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(3a) A passing grade in an advanced course, as defined in G.S. 115C-174.26(a), or
a dual enrollment course, shall satisfy the Founding Principles of the United
States of America and the State of North Carolina course requirement if, in
addition to meeting the requirements of this section, the course requires
students to read the following documents in their entirety:
a. The Constitution of the United States of America.
b. The Declaration of Independence.
c. The Emancipation Proclamation.
d. At least five essays from the Federalist Papers, as determined by the
teacher.
e. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s Letter from Birmingham Jail.
f. The Gettysburg Address.
g. The North Carolina State Constitution."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with courses offered in the 2025-2026 school year.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies beginning in the 2026-2027 academic year to students accepted for initial enrollment
in a baccalaureate program at a constituent institution or initial enrollment in an associate degree
program at a community college.
Page 4 Senate Bill 300-First Edition